District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2314

Delivery of deed.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 13, 1960, 74 Stat. 917, Pub. L. 86-776, § 2
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1814.
1973 Ed., § 31-1034.